District of Columbia statutes.
44-1051.05

Expiration of license.

A license issued by the Department pursuant to this chapter shall expire one year from the date of initial issuance or most recent renewal, unless it is sooner terminated or renewed.

March 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-74, § 5, 50 DCR 10914

History